Hawaii statutes.
§46-2 Publication or advertising of
ordinances, amendments, resolutions, and bills. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, whenever any law requires the publication or
advertisement of ordinances, amendments, resolutions, or bills, the publication
or advertisement shall be in a newspaper of general circulation within the
county concerned, and need not be in a daily newspaper. [L 1963, c 71, §1;
Supp, §138-51; HRS §46-2]

Case Notes

Voluntary county decision to place advertising in papers
other than plaintiff's during strike, not enjoinable. 272 F. Supp. 175.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next